Utah statutes.
17-53-203.   Chair -- Oaths -- Quorum.

(1)  Each county legislative body shall elect one of their number chair and may elect a vice chair.

(2) (a)  The chair shall preside at all meetings of the county legislative body, and in case of the chair's absence or inability to act, the vice chair, if there is one, shall preside.

(b)  If both the chair and vice chair, if there is one, are absent or unable to act, the members present shall, by an order entered in their minutes, select one of their number to act as chair temporarily.

(3)  Any member of the county legislative body may administer oaths to any person when necessary in the performance of official duties.

(4)  Not less than a majority of members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and no act of the county legislative body shall be valid or binding unless a majority of members present when a quorum is present concurs therein.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 133, 2000 General Session

